Hawaii statutes.
[§501-20.5] Rules. The supreme court
of the State of Hawaii shall adopt, amend, and repeal rules relating to the
processing of land court documents and instruments. [L 1986, c 246, §2]

Rules of Court

See Rules of the Land Court.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next